Mississippi, session 2026, SB2115.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 73-29-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-29-3.  In this chapter, unless the context requires a different definition: "Board" means the polygraph examiners board * * *;. "Secretary" means that member of the polygraph examiners board selected by the board to act as secretary * * *;. "Internship" means the study of polygraph examinations and of the administration of polygraph examinations by a trainee under the personal supervision and control of a polygraph examiner in accordance with a course of study prescribed by the board at the commencement of such internship * * *;. "Person" means any natural person, firm, association, copartnership, or corporation * * *;and. "Polygraph examiner" means any person who uses * * * any device or a polygraph instrument to test or question individuals for the purpose of verifying the truth of statements. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.